Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 1

Tennessee Veterinary Practice Act

63-12-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Veterinary Practice Act.”

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-1201; 2016, ch. 819, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 716, §§ 1-3 provided: “Notwithstanding any provision of the law to the contrary, the board of veterinary medical examiners shall refund all monetary fines and civil penalties imposed and collected in fiscal years 2004-2005 and 2005-2006 for the artificial insemination of livestock without a veterinary medical license, upon proper application by a person or persons fined for such practice.

“The provisions of this act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds, and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to this act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.

“The board of veterinary medical examiners shall promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, title 4, chapter 5.”

Cross-References. Occupation tax on veterinarians, title 67, ch. 4, part 17.

Law Reviews.

Report on Administrative Law to the Tennessee Law Revision Commission, 20 Vand. L. Rev. 777.

Attorney General Opinions. The unlicensed sale or distribution of prescription veterinary drugs is a violation of the Pharmacy Practice Act, OAG 03-135, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 151 (10/13/03).

Both criminal and civil penalties may be imposed upon an unlicensed person or entity for selling or distributing prescription veterinary drugs, OAG 03-135, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 151 (10/13/03).

The Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners has jurisdiction over an unlicensed person or entity that is selling or distributing prescription veterinary drugs, provided that such sale or distribution occurs either within the scope of practice of veterinary medicine, or with respect to any person, corporation or similar organization required to be licensed, permitted or authorized by the Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners; in addition, the Board of Pharmacy has jurisdiction over an unlicensed person or entity that is selling or distributing prescription veterinary drugs without a license, OAG 03-135, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 151 (10/13/03).

63-12-102. Purpose of chapter.

It is hereby declared that the practice of veterinary medicine is a privilege that is granted by legislative authority in the interest of the public health, safety and welfare. To protect the public from being misled by incompetent, unscrupulous and unauthorized practitioners and from unprofessional or illegal practices by persons licensed to practice veterinary medicine, this chapter is enacted in the interest of the health, safety and welfare of the animal population and the citizens of Tennessee.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 2; T.C.A., § 63-1202; Acts 1983, ch. 57, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

63-12-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Animal” means any animal other than man and includes fowl, birds, reptiles and fish, wild or domestic, living or dead;

“Board” means the board of veterinary medical examiners;

“Certified animal control agency” means a county or municipal animal shelter, dog pound or animal control agency, private humane society, state, county or municipal law enforcement agency, or any combination thereof, that temporarily houses stray, unwanted or injured animals and that is certified pursuant to this chapter;

“Certified animal euthanasia technician” means a person employed by a certified animal control agency who is authorized by the board to humanely euthanize animals by administering such drugs as are designated by the board for such use;

“Complainant” means the board or any other person who initiates a proceeding;

“Consultation” means when a licensed veterinarian receives advice in person, telephonically, electronically, or by any other method of communication, from a veterinarian licensed in this or any other state, or other person whose expertise, in the opinion of the licensed veterinarian, would benefit a patient. Under all circumstances, the responsibility for the welfare of the patient remains with the licensed veterinarian receiving consultation;

“License” means any permit, approval, registration or certificate issued by the board;

“Licensed veterinarian” means a person who is validly and currently licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state;

“Licensed veterinary technician” means a person who has successfully completed the examination requirements prescribed by the board and has been issued a license;

“Practice of veterinary medicine” means to:

Diagnose, treat, correct, change, alleviate, or prevent animal disease, illness, pain, deformity, defect, injury, or other physical, dental, or mental conditions by any method or mode, including:

The prescription, dispensing, administration or application of any drug, medicine, biologic, apparatus, anesthetic, or other therapeutic or diagnostic substance or medical or surgical, including cosmetic, technique;

The use of complementary, alternative, and integrative therapies;

The use of any manual, mechanical, biological, or chemical procedure for the testing of pregnancy, or for the management or treatment of sterility or infertility;

The rendering of advice or recommendation by any means including telephonic and other electronic communications with regard to subdivisions (10)(A)(i)(a)-(c) ; and

The collection of blood or other samples for the purpose of diagnosing disease or other conditions. This shall not apply to:

Any unlicensed personnel employed by the United States department of agriculture or the Tennessee department of agriculture who are engaged in animal disease control programs, or who perform laboratory examinations. This section does not prohibit extension personnel or vocational agriculture teachers from doing educational work that is considered normal to their profession in their government positions; or

The removal of an embryo from livestock or companion animal for the purpose of transplanting such embryo into another female animal or for the purpose of cryopreserving such embryo;

The practice of veterinary medicine occurs wherever the patient is at the time services are rendered;

“Preceptor” means a person who is a last year student duly enrolled and in good standing in a recognized college of veterinary medicine. Such person's presence in a practice may be as part of a formal preceptorship program of the person's college or as an informal arrangement between the person and a veterinarian licensed by the board. The preceptor must be under direct supervision of such licensed veterinarian;

“Veterinarian-client-patient relationship” means:

“Veterinarian” means a person who has received a doctor of veterinary medicine degree or its equivalent from an approved school or college of veterinary medicine;

“Unprofessional or unethical conduct,” among other things, means any conduct of a character likely to deceive or defraud the public, objectionable advertising, obtaining any fee or compensation by fraud or misrepresentation, sharing office space with any person illegally practicing veterinary medicine, employing either directly or indirectly any unlicensed person to practice veterinary medicine or render any veterinary service except as provided in this chapter or the violation of any rule adopted by the board, which shall provide a code of professional ethics to be followed and carried out by persons licensed under this chapter;

“Temporary license” means temporary permission to practice veterinary medicine issued pursuant to this chapter;

“School of veterinary medicine” means any veterinary school or college, department of a university or college, legally organized, whose course of study in the art and science of veterinary medicine conforms to the standards required for accreditation by the American Veterinary Medical Association and approved by the board;

“Responsible supervision” or words of similar purport mean the control, direction and regulation by a licensed veterinarian of the duties involving veterinary services that such veterinarian delegates to such veterinarian's personnel;

The veterinarian has assumed responsibility for making clinical judgments regarding the health of the animal and the need for medical treatment, has obtained informed consent, and the client has agreed to follow the veterinarian's instructions;

The veterinarian has sufficient knowledge of the animal to initiate at least a general or preliminary diagnosis of the medical condition of the animal;

The veterinarian has seen the animal within the last twelve (12) months or is personally acquainted with the keeping and care of the animal, either by virtue of an examination of the animal or by medically appropriate visits to the premises where the animal is maintained within the last twelve (12) months;

The veterinarian is readily available or has arranged for emergency coverage for follow-up evaluation in the event of adverse reactions or the failure of the treatment regimen;

The veterinarian must maintain medical records as required by the board of veterinary medical examiners; and

The veterinarian-client-patient relationship cannot be established or maintained solely by telephone or other electronic means;

“Veterinary facility” means:

Animal medical center — A veterinary or animal medical center means a facility in which consultative, clinical and hospital services are rendered and in which a large staff of basic and applied veterinary scientists perform significant research and conduct advanced professional educational programs;

Clinics — A veterinary or animal clinic means a facility in which the practice conducted is essentially an outpatient type of practice;

Hospital — A veterinary or animal hospital means a facility in which the practice conducted includes the confinement, as well as the treatment, of patients;

Mobile facility — A practice conducted from a vehicle with special medical or surgical facilities or from a vehicle suitable only for making house or farm calls. Regardless of mode of transportation, such practice shall have a permanent base of operations with a published address and telephone facilities for making appointments or responding to emergency situations; and

Office — A veterinary facility where a limited or consultative practice is conducted and that provides no facilities for the housing of patients;

“Veterinary medicine” includes veterinary surgery, obstetrics, dentistry and all other branches or specialties of veterinary medicine; and

“Veterinary technician” means a person who is a graduate of a veterinary technology program accredited by the American Veterinary Medical Association.

Represent, directly or indirectly, publicly or privately, an ability and willingness to do an act described in subdivision (10)(A); and

Use any title, words, abbreviation, or letters in a manner or under circumstances that induce the belief that the person using them is qualified to do any act described in subdivision (10)(A)(i). Such use shall be prima facie evidence of the intention to represent oneself as engaged in the practice of veterinary medicine;

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 3; T.C.A., § 63-1203; Acts 1982, ch. 598, § 1; 1983, ch. 57, § 2; 1997, ch. 106, § 2; 1999, ch. 375, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 804, §§ 1, 2; 2016, ch. 819, § 3.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment, in the definition of “practice of veterinary medicine”, redesignated the former introductory language as present (A), redesignated former (A)-(C) as present (A)(i)-(iii), respectively, redesignated former (A)(i)-(v) as present (A)(a )-(e ), respectively, redesignated former (A)(v)(a ) and (b ) as present (A)(e )(1 ) and (e )(2 ) and added present (B).

63-12-104. Creation of board — Appointment and removal of members.

There is created the board of veterinary medical examiners, referred to as the “board” in this chapter.

The board shall be composed of:

Five (5) licensed doctors of veterinary medicine, who shall be graduates of an approved school of veterinary medicine and of good standing in their profession and who have had not less than five (5) years' actual experience in the practice of veterinary medicine;

One (1) licensed veterinary technician who shall be a graduate of an approved veterinary technology program, is of good standing in the profession, and who has had not less than five (5) years' actual experience as a licensed veterinary technician; and

One (1) member of the general public as provided by § 63-1-124.

The members of the board shall be appointed by the governor for a term of five (5) years. Each member so appointed shall serve until the expiration of the particular five-year term to which the member is appointed and thereafter until the member's successor has been appointed by the governor. The governor shall appoint new members to the board to serve after the date of expiration of each of these terms until August 1 of the fifth calendar year thereafter. In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the board is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the board is a member of a racial minority.

In the event of a vacancy on the board, the governor shall appoint a new member to serve out the unexpired term. No member may be reappointed to the board until one (1) year after the expiration of the member's term of office, except that a person appointed for a term of less than five (5) years may be reappointed.

Members of the board may be appointed by the governor from lists of qualified nominees submitted by interested veterinary groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Veterinary Medical Association. The governor shall consult with such interested groups to determine qualified persons to fill the positions. This subsection (e) shall not apply to the appointment of the public member.

No person who has been appointed a member of the board shall continue on the board if during the term of the member's appointment the member shall:

Transfer the member's legal residence to another state;

Be or become the owner of, or be employed by, any wholesale or jobbing house dealing in supplies, equipment or instruments used or useful in the practice of veterinary medicine; or

Have the member's license to practice veterinary medicine rescinded for cause in accordance with this chapter.

The governor may suspend any member of the board for malfeasance, misfeasance, gross inefficiency or misconduct or upon any of the constitutional grounds upon which officers may be suspended by the governor.

The state veterinarian, as appointed by the commissioner of agriculture, shall serve as a nonvoting, ex officio member of the board of veterinary medical examiners.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 4; T.C.A., § 63-1204; Acts 1988, ch. 1013, § 50; 1998, ch. 649, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 375, §§ 3, 4; 2004, ch. 567, § 1; 2012, ch. 695, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The regulatory board created by this section is attached to the division of health related boards in the department of health. See §§ 63-1-131 — 63-1-133, 68-1-101.

The board of veterinary medical examiners, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-242.

Cross-References. State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

63-12-105. Meetings of board — Officers — Rules and regulations — Quorum — Seal.

The board shall meet annually at such time and place as may be agreed upon by a majority of the members, at which meeting it shall elect from its membership a president, vice president, and secretary. The board is authorized to create other officers and to adopt such rules and regulations as may be proper for the efficient operation of the board.

Four (4) members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business.

The board shall meet at such other times and places to conduct business upon call of the president.

The board shall adopt a seal that shall be affixed to all licenses issued by the board and to other papers requiring the same.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 5; T.C.A., § 63-1205; Acts 1983, ch. 57, § 3; 1998, ch. 649, § 3.

Cross-References. Additional quorum provisions, § 63-12-107.

63-12-106. Powers of board.

The board is authorized to:

Adopt reasonable rules governing the practice of veterinary medicine as are necessary to enable it to carry out and make effective the purpose and intent of this chapter. Such rules shall be adopted pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5;

Adopt rules of professional conduct appropriate to establish and maintain a high standard of integrity, skills and practice in the profession of veterinary medicine. In prescribing such rules of professional conduct, the board may be guided by the principles of veterinary medical ethics adopted by the American Veterinary Medical Association and the Tennessee Veterinary Medical Association;

Have its rules printed and distributed to all licensed doctors of veterinary medicine;

Bring proceedings in courts for the enforcement of this chapter or any rules made pursuant thereto;

Hold at least one (1) regular meeting each year at such time and place as fixed by the board. Other meetings may be held upon the call of the president and secretary. The regular meetings will be for the purpose of conducting examinations of applications for license to practice veterinary medicine, the election of officers and to consider any other business that may properly come before the board;

Pass upon the qualifications of applicants for a license to practice veterinary medicine in this state;

Prescribe the subjects, character, manner, time and place of holding examinations and the filing of applications for examinations and to conduct the examinations;

Issue temporary permits or licenses, which shall be signed by the secretary, to duly qualified applicants;

Provide for, regulate and require all persons licensed in accordance with this chapter to renew their license annually, require as a condition precedent to such annual renewal the payment of the annual renewal fee as provided in § 63-12-121, issue annual renewal licenses to such persons and suspend or revoke the license of such persons who fail, refuse or neglect to renew same or pay such fees;

Conduct investigations and hearings upon complaints calling for discipline of a licensee or applicant for license or certificate or permit holder or applicant for a certificate or a permit;

Take testimony on any matter under its jurisdiction, and any member thereof may administer oaths;

Issue summonses and subpoenas, including subpoenas duces tecum, which shall be signed by either the president or the secretary-treasurer of the board, for any witness in connection with any matter within the jurisdiction of the board;

Adopt such forms as it may deem necessary;

Establish continuing educational requirements; and

Issue such certificates as are authorized under this chapter.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, §§ 6, 35; T.C.A., § 63-1206; Acts 1983, ch. 57, § 4; 1997, ch. 106, §§ 3, 4.

Attorney General Opinions. The adoption by the board of veterinary medical examiners of various proposed rules concerning the definition of “physical plant” would not exceed its statutory authority under the Veterinary Practice Act, T.C.A. § 63-12-101, OAG 02-007, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 5 (1/4/02).

63-12-107. Meetings of board.

The board shall meet at least once each year at such times and places as it may decide upon and remain in session sufficiently long to examine all who may make application at the appointed time for a license.

Four (4) members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and examination of candidates for license. A majority of those present shall be necessary to reject any application, but such rejection shall not bar the applicant from reexamination at the next regular meeting of the board.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 7; T.C.A., § 63-1207; Acts 1998, ch. 649, § 4.

Cross-References. Additional quorum provisions, § 63-12-105.

63-12-108. Compensation of members — Expenses of board.

The members of the board shall receive as compensation for their services one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day or portion thereof, each, while in actual service of the board, which, together with the necessary expenses of each meeting of the board, shall be paid out of any moneys in the treasury of the board upon the certificate of the president and secretary.

All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 8; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(117); T.C.A., § 63-1208; Acts 2013, ch. 440, § 1.

63-12-109. Funds of board — Disposition of surplus.

It is unlawful for the board or any member thereof, in any manner whatsoever or for any purpose, to charge or obligate the state for the payment of any money, and the board shall look alone to the revenue derived from the operation of this chapter for the compensation designated in § 63-12-108. If the revenue is not sufficient to pay each member in full, together with the necessary expenses of the board, then the amount available shall be prorated among the members. But if there should be a greater revenue derived than shall be required to pay the compensation and expenses, including, but not limited to, the administrative and personnel expenses deemed necessary in the discretion of the board to conduct inspections and issue licenses, permits and certificates as provided by this chapter, directed, any surplus shall be paid to the state treasurer, who shall receipt the board for the amount so received and shall account for the money as for other state revenue.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 9; T.C.A., § 63-1209; Acts 1997, ch. 106, § 10.

63-12-110. Records of board — Confidentiality.

The board shall keep records of its proceedings in a book provided for that purpose, especially with relation to the issuance, denial, renewal, suspension and revocation of licenses to practice veterinary medicine.

All licenses issued by the board shall be numbered and recorded by the secretary in a file for that purpose; and where a license is denied by the board to any applicant under this chapter, the fact and grounds for such denial shall be entered on the minutes of the board.

The time of issuance or denial of license shall be noted along with the names of those board members present, and such file or record shall be open to public inspection.

These records shall be maintained in the division.

Information received by the board through inspections and investigations shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed except in a proceeding involving the question of license.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 10; T.C.A., § 63-1210; Acts 1983, ch. 57, § 5.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

63-12-111. Approval of veterinary schools.

The board may approve schools and colleges of veterinary medicine which maintain standards of training and reputability sufficient to admit their graduates to the examinations given by the board.

In determining the standard of training and reputation of schools or colleges of veterinary medicine, the board may approve schools and colleges that are accredited by the American Veterinary Medical Association.

The board may approve graduates of foreign schools of veterinary medicine that have been approved by the American Veterinary Medical Association or by obtaining proof that the college or school maintains standards equal to the standards of approved colleges or schools in the United States to take the examinations given by the board.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 11; T.C.A., § 63-1211.

63-12-112. License requirement — Qualifications of applicants.

Any person wishing to practice veterinary medicine in this state shall obtain a license from the board. It is unlawful for such person to practice veterinary medicine as defined in § 63-12-103 unless the person obtains a license; and if the person so practices, the person shall be considered to have violated this chapter.

The board may admit to examination any applicant who submits satisfactory evidence that the applicant:

Is a graduate of a school or college of veterinary medicine approved by the board;

Is in good physical and mental health;

Is of good moral character;

Is a citizen of the United States or Canada or legally entitled to live within the United States;

Subscribes to and will uphold the principles incorporated in the Constitution of the United States; and

Has paid the required fee.

Any person holding a license to practice veterinary medicine in this state that is valid on September 1, 1967, is considered to be licensed to practice veterinary medicine under this chapter and is subject to all the provisions thereof.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, §§ 12, 35; T.C.A., § 63-1212; Acts 1982, ch. 611, § 1; 1983, ch. 57, § 6.

Cross-References. Exemption from licensing requirements for practice of medicine, § 63-6-204.

Licensing, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

63-12-113. Temporary licenses.

The board may issue a temporary license to practice veterinary medicine, to be used only under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian, upon payment of a fee as set by the board, to:

A veterinarian who meets all qualifications and requirements pursuant to this chapter and who has applied to take the examination as provided in § 63-12-115. Such license shall remain valid until the results of the examinations are made known to the applicant;

Failure on both examinations will result in immediate termination of the license;

If the applicant fails one (1) of the examinations, the applicant may be issued a second temporary license but must continue under direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian and only until the results of the next regularly scheduled examination are known;

If an applicant fails the same examination on two (2) separate testing dates, the applicant may, in the discretion of the board, and upon agreeing to meet any additional requirements of the board, be issued a third temporary license for up to one (1) year, plus the time until the results of the second regularly scheduled examination after issuance of the temporary license are made known;

No applicant shall be allowed to take the same examination more than three (3) times;

During the validity of the temporary license, the applicant must be under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian;

New graduates applying for such temporary license must provide the name and address of practice of the supervising veterinarian and any other requirements specified by the board in rules and regulations;

A veterinarian duly licensed according to the laws of another state and who has made application for permanent licensure in Tennessee;

A temporary license issued under this section shall be valid until the board rules on the applicant's request;

If the board's decision is to issue a license without examination, the temporary license expires on receipt of the permanent license;

If the board's decision is for examination, then the law applies as stated in subdivision (1);

An applicant who holds a license in another state or states must provide the name or names of such states, meet all qualifications and requirements pursuant to this chapter, provide the name and address of practice of the supervising veterinarian, and meet such other requirements as specified by the board in rules and regulations. All information submitted by an applicant will be subject to verification by the board;

A graduate of a nonaccredited or nonapproved college of veterinary medicine who has satisfactorily completed the fourth year of clinical study at an accredited or approved college of veterinary medicine, successfully passed the examination as provided in § 63-12-115 and is enrolled in the Educational Commission for Foreign Veterinary Graduates (ECFVG) program of the American Veterinary Medical Association or other certification program deemed by the board to be equivalent to the ECFVG program may be granted a temporary license. The holder of a temporary license issued under this section must practice under the direct supervision of a veterinarian licensed in Tennessee. The temporary license is valid until the candidate obtains the ECFVG or equivalent certification; provided, that a temporary license issued pursuant to this section shall not be valid for more than a maximum of eighteen (18) months from the date the temporary license is issued.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 13; T.C.A., § 63-1213; Acts 1983, ch. 57, § 7; 1989, ch. 523, § 71; 2004, ch. 522, § 1.

Cross-References. Temporary authorization to practice, § 63-1-142.

63-12-114. Application for examination.

Any person desiring to take the state board written and oral examination shall make application in writing to the board on blanks provided for that purpose at least forty-five (45) days before the examination.

The application for the state board written and oral examination shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee as set by the board.

The application for the national board examination shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee as set by the board.

Any person desiring to take the clinical competency test shall make application in writing to the board on blanks provided for that purpose at least forty-five (45) days before the examination.

The application for the clinical competency test shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee as set by the board.

Applicants who are accepted for the state board written and oral examination shall pay a fee to the board at least forty-five (45) days prior to taking the examination, as set by the board.

Applicants who are accepted for the national board examination shall pay a fee to the board at least forty-five (45) days prior to taking the examination as set by the board.

Applicants who are accepted for the clinical competency test shall pay a fee to the board at least forty-five (45) days prior to taking the examination as set by the board.

The board shall give notice of the time and place of all examinations in such manner as the board may consider expedient.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 14; 1980, ch. 568, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-1214; Acts 1988, ch. 752, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 72-77.

Cross-References. Application for licenses, § 63-1-103.

63-12-115. Examinations.

The examination of applicants for license to practice veterinary medicine shall be administered by designated board members, and will consist of the national board examination and the state board examination and will be conducted under uniform rules and regulations adopted by the board.

The board shall require the applicant to take a written examination in the English language, in veterinary anatomy, veterinary surgery, veterinary physiology, veterinary pathology, veterinary obstetrics, veterinary materia medica and veterinary practice, chemistry and such other subjects related to veterinary medicine as the board may require.

The examination may include oral and practical examinations.

The minimum passing grade shall be established by the board.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 15; T.C.A., § 63-1215; Acts 1983, ch. 57, § 8.

63-12-116. Issuance of licenses.

If the applicant for examination be found worthy and competent by the board, it shall issue to the applicant a certificate of license to practice veterinary medicine in this state.

Each licensee shall be entitled to exercise all the rights and privileges of a doctor of veterinary medicine. Every person practicing veterinary medicine shall be governed by the laws of this state and the rules adopted by the board.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 16; T.C.A., § 63-1216.

63-12-117. Issuance of license without examination — Reciprocity.

The board, in its discretion, may issue a license without a written examination to a qualified applicant who furnishes satisfactory proof that the applicant is a graduate of an approved veterinary college and meets all other standards adopted by the board in rules and regulations. At its discretion, the board may orally or practically examine any person qualifying for license under this section or may enter into agreement for reciprocal licensing with other states having substantially similar requirements for licensure.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 17; T.C.A., § 63-1217; Acts 1983, ch. 57, § 9.

63-12-118. Veterinary wellness committees.

As used in this section, “veterinary wellness committee” or “committee” means any committee, board, commission, or other entity established by any state-wide veterinary medical association or local veterinary medical association for the purpose of providing immediate and continuing help to veterinary professionals licensed to practice veterinary medicine or veterinary technology, students of veterinary medicine and veterinary technology, certified animal euthanasia technicians, and employees of veterinary practices in this state who suffer from physical or mental conditions that result from disease, disorder, trauma, or age and that impair their ability to perform their duties in veterinary medicine with reasonable skill and safety.

Veterinary wellness committee members, employees, and agents, including volunteers, taking any action authorized by this chapter, engaging in the performance of any duties on behalf of the committee, or participating in any administrative or judicial proceeding resulting from their participation on the committee, shall be immune from civil or criminal liability with respect to any action taken in good faith and without malice.

All information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda, or other data furnished to or produced by a veterinary wellness committee and any findings, conclusions, reports, or recommendations resulting from the proceedings of the committee are privileged and confidential. Information and actions taken by the committee shall be privileged and held in strictest confidence and shall not be disclosed or required to be disclosed to any person or entity outside of the committee, unless such disclosure is authorized by the member of the veterinary profession to whom it relates. Nothing contained in this subsection (c) applies to records, documents, or information otherwise available from original sources, and such records, documents, or information are not immune from discovery or use in any civil proceedings solely due to having been presented to the committee.

Acts 2016, ch. 819, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-12-118 (Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 18; T.C.A., § 63-1218), concerning recordation and display of licenses, was repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 57, § 10. For present provisions, see § 63-1-109.

63-12-119. Penalty for unlicensed practice.

Any person who practices or attempts to practice veterinary medicine in this state and makes a charge for the practice without having complied with this chapter commits a Class B misdemeanor for each instance of such practice.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 19; T.C.A., § 63-1219; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 112.

Cross-References. Penalties, § 63-1-123.

Penalties for violation of statute, rule or order, recovery, § 63-1-134.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-12-120. Continuing education.

Each license holder under this chapter, except as otherwise provided, shall be required to meet continuing educational requirements each year within the renewal period, which are approved by the board, such as those conducted or sponsored by the Tennessee Veterinary Medical Association, the Southern Veterinary Medical Association, the American Veterinary Medical Association or any of its constituent branches. The minimum number of hours of attendance for continuing education so required shall be prescribed by the board. However, postgraduate study or attendance at an institution or an educational session approved by the board shall be considered equivalent, but the board shall have the right, for good cause shown, to prescribe the type and character of postgraduate study to be done by any doctor of veterinary medicine in order to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

The board, in its discretion, may waive the annual continuing education requirements for good cause shown.

The board shall promulgate, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, rules that establish criteria for issuance of the continuing education credits required by this section.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 20; T.C.A., § 63-1220; Acts 1983, ch. 57, § 11; 1984, ch. 906, § 3.